Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 1. Bills.

Sec. 24.08.010.
General procedure.

The procedure for handling bills from the time of their prefiling or introduction until they become law is provided in this chapter subject to implementing rules adopted by the legislature.
Resolutions shall be handled in accordance with the provisions of the uniform rules of the legislature.

History.

(§ 29 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 26 ch 71 SLA 1972)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

24.30.010

.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For resolutions generally, see Rule 49, Uniform Rules of the Alaska State Legislature; for resolutions proposing constitutional amendments, see AS

24.08.200

; for resolutions disapproving executive orders, see AS

24.08.210

.

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 14.

Sec. 24.08.020.
Subject of bills.

The subject of each bill shall be expressed in its title and every bill shall be confined to one subject unless it is an appropriation bill or one codifying, revising, or rearranging existing laws.
The limitation to one subject shall be liberally construed to permit the subject to include all matters that reasonably can be considered germane to the subject in accomplishing the legal objective of the bill.

History.

(§ 30 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.020.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 13.

Sec. 24.08.030.
Appropriation bills.

Bills for appropriation shall be confined to appropriations and shall include the amount involved and the purpose, method, manner, and other related conditions of payment.

History.

(§ 31 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.030.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 13.

Sec. 24.08.035.
Fiscal notes on bills.

Before a bill or resolution, except an appropriation bill, is reported from the committee of first referral, there shall be attached to the bill a fiscal note containing an estimate of the amount of the appropriation increase or decrease that would result from enactment of the bill for the current fiscal year and five succeeding fiscal years or, if the bill has no fiscal impact, a statement to that effect shall be attached. The fiscal note or statement shall be prepared in conformity with the requirements of this section by the department or departments affected and may be reviewed by the office of management and budget. The fiscal note or statement shall be delivered to the committee requesting it within three days of the request. If the bill is presented by the governor for introduction in accordance with AS

24.08.060(b)

and the uniform rules of the legislature, the fiscal note or statement shall be attached to the bill before the bill is introduced. An amendment or a substitute bill proposed by a committee of referral that changes the fiscal impact of a bill shall be explained in a revised fiscal note or statement attached to the bill.

In addition to the fiscal note required by this section, the sponsor of a bill or resolution may prepare a fiscal note in conformity with the requirements of this section and submit it to the committee of first referral or the finance committee. A committee may prepare an additional fiscal note in conformity with the requirements of this section.

A fiscal note for a bill or resolution must contain the following information:

the fiscal impact on existing programs;

the fiscal impact of new programs or activities;

a line item detail of the fiscal impact;

the source of funds expected to be utilized by general fund source, federal fund source, or other identified source;

the number of new positions that may be required, identified as full-time, part-time, or temporary;

an analysis of how the figures in the fiscal note were derived;

additional information necessary to explain the fiscal note;

a fiscal impact projection for the current fiscal year and for the succeeding five fiscal years; and

formal information consisting of

the bill or resolution number,

the name of the prime sponsors,

the date the fiscal note was prepared,

the name of the committee requesting the fiscal note,

the name and phone number of the person who prepared the fiscal note, and

the budget request unit, program, or subprogram affected.

The original of a fiscal note shall be submitted to the Division of Legislative Finance and copies shall be sent to the prime sponsor, the committee requesting the fiscal note, and the office of management and budget.

[Repealed, § 2 ch 64 SLA 1992.]

In addition to the other requirements of this section, if a bill directs an agency in the executive branch of state government to adopt, amend, or repeal a regulation or will result in an agency’s adopting, amending, or repealing a regulation, the department affected shall include in the fiscal note for the bill a specific time by which the agency shall adopt, amend, or repeal the regulation. If the agency is not able to meet the deadline set in the fiscal note, the agency shall set a new deadline.

In (f) of this section, “agency” includes the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority, the Alaska Energy Authority, the Alaska Public Offices Commission, and the Alaska Oil and Gas Conservation Commission, but does not include other boards or commissions.

History.

(§ 1 ch 153 SLA 1968; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 60 SLA 1979; am §§ 3, 4 ch 63 SLA 1983; am §§ 1, 2 ch 64 SLA 1992; am § 4 ch 34 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 42 SLA 2012; am § 23 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.035.
Renumbered in 1985.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, added (f) and (g).

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, repealed (f)(2).

Sec. 24.08.036.
Fiscal notes on bills affecting state retirement systems.

Before a bill which would have an effect on the retirement systems of the state is reported to the rules committee, there shall be attached to the bill an analysis of the long-term and short-term costs to the state if the bill is adopted, as well as the impact of the bill on the actuarial soundness of the fund.
The analysis is in addition to the fiscal note requirements of AS

24.08.035

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 130 SLA 1977; am § 3 ch 60 SLA 1979; am § 81 ch 6 SLA 1984)

Revisor’s notes. —

Enacted as AS 24.30.037.
Renumbered as AS 24.30.036 in 1977. Renumbered again in 1985.

Sec. 24.08.037.
General obligation bond bills.

A bill authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds creating a state debt for capital improvements shall contain a statement of the scope of each project included in the proposed bond issue. The statement shall include a brief description of each capital improvement project, its location, and, in dollars, that portion of the total bond issue to be allocated to the project.

History.

(§ 2 ch 70 SLA 1973; am § 30 ch 197 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.037.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to the responsibility of the director to provide statements of the scope of bond projects with sample ballots, see AS

15.15.040(b)

.

Sec. 24.08.040.
Enacting clause.

The enacting clause for each bill shall be: “Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Alaska.”

History.

(§ 32 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.040.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 13.

Sec. 24.08.050.
Prefiling of bills and resolutions.

Any member of the legislature whose term extends into a forthcoming session or legislature, or a member-elect may file a bill or resolution or a proposal for a bill or resolution with the Legislative Affairs Agency at any time before January 1.
The agency shall place a prefiled bill or resolution, which is approved by the sponsor, in proper form and deliver it to the chief clerk of the appropriate house on the day on which the next session convenes or is organized for business. Prefiled bills or resolutions shall be considered as introduced on the day of their delivery to each house.

History.

(§ 33 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 9 ch 47 SLA 1961; am § 37 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 20 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.050.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.08.060.
Introduction of bills and resolutions.

A member of the legislature or a committee chairman, with the concurrence of a majority of the active members of the committee and on behalf of the committee, may introduce a bill or resolution. Bills and resolutions shall be prepared and introduced in the manner and form prescribed in the uniform rules and the legislative style manual.

Bills introduced by the legislative council shall be delivered with a letter of explanation to the rules committee of either house and bear the inscription “Rules Committee by Request of the Legislative Council”; bills introduced by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall be delivered with a letter of explanation to the rules committee of either house and bear the inscription “Rules Committee by Request of the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee”; bills presented by the governor shall be delivered with a letter to the rules committee of either house and bear the inscription “Rules Committee by Request of the Governor”; bills so presented and inscribed shall be received as bills carrying the approval of the governor as to policy and budget impact. The governor may submit a statement of purpose and effect with each bill and appear personally or through a representative before any committee considering legislation.

History.

(§ 34 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 10 ch 47 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1971; am § 38 ch 32 SLA 1971; am § 27 ch 71 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 2 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 7 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.060.
Renumbered in 1985.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective August 1, 2018, in (b), deleted “bills introduced by the administrative regulation review committee shall be delivered with a letter of explanation to the rules committee of either house and bear the inscription ‘Rules Committee by Request of the Administrative Regulation Review Committee’” preceding “bills introduced by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee”, and made stylistic changes.

Sec. 24.08.070.
Numbering of bills.

The chief clerk of the house in which the bill is introduced shall number it in the order of its introduction and thereafter the bill shall be designated by the number given to it.

History.

(§ 35 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 11 ch 47 SLA 1961)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.070.
Renumbered in 1985.

Sec. 24.08.080.
Readings.

A bill may not become law unless it has passed three readings in each house on three separate days, except that a bill may be advanced from second to third reading on the same day by concurrence of three-fourths of the house considering it.

History.

(§ 36 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.080.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 14.

Sec. 24.08.090.
Vote on passage.

A bill may not become law without the affirmative vote of a majority of the membership of each house.
The yeas and the nays on final passage shall be recorded in the journal.

History.

(§ 37 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.090.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 14.

Sec. 24.08.100.
Action upon veto.

When the governor vetoes a bill or by veto strikes or reduces an item in an appropriation bill, during a regular session of the legislature, the legislature shall proceed to act in accordance with art. II, sec. 16, Constitution of the State of Alaska, as it is implemented by the rules of the legislature. A bill vetoed after adjournment of the first regular session shall be reconsidered by the legislature sitting as one body no later than the fifth day of the next regular or special session convened during that legislature.
Bills vetoed after adjournment of the second regular session shall be reconsidered by the legislature sitting as one body no later than the fifth day of a special session of that legislature, if one is called.

History.

(§ 38 ch 157 SLA 1959; am § 2 ch 67 SLA 1975)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 24.30.100.
Renumbered in 1985.

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 16.

Sec. 24.08.105.
Record of votes.

The voting record for each legislator shall be made available to any person on request. The Legislative Affairs Agency shall keep voting records compiled annually under this section on the agency data system and shall distribute copies to all legislative information offices for a fee established under AS

40.25.115

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 200 SLA 1990)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 2000, “AS

40.25.115

” was substituted for “AS 09.25.115” to reflect the 2000 renumbering of AS 09.25.115.

Sec. 24.08.110.
Bills carry over.

A bill introduced but not receiving final action in the first regular session of a legislature carries over in the same reading or status into the second regular session of the same legislature.

History.

(§ 40 ch 157 SLA 1959)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

24.30.120

.
Renumbered in 1985.